Tennessee statutes. Title 12 Public Property, Printing And Contracts
Part 5

Competitive Solicitations

12-3-501. Award of contracts by competitive sealed solicitations.

Unless otherwise authorized by law, state contracts shall be awarded by competitive sealed solicitations by the central procurement office in the manner set forth in §12-3-502, except as provided in §12-3-401 and §§12-3-503 —12-3-508.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 20.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Former title 12, ch. 3, part 5, §§12-3-501 —12-3-531 (Acts 1953, ch. 163, §§ 4-6, 27 (Williams, §§ 370.13-370.15, 370.36); modified; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 5; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 5; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 543, § 7; Acts 1975, ch. 202, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§12-304-12-308,12-3-204 —12-3-208; Acts 1981, ch. 94, §§ 1-4; 1981, ch. 332, §§ 2-6; 1987, ch. 337, § 19; 2005, ch. 166, § 1; 2010, ch. 1098, § 2; 2011, ch. 295, §§ 5, 19), concerning specification, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2013, ch. 403, §§ 20-34, effective July 1, 2013.

Former title 12, chs. 3 and 4 were recodified by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013. In the recodification, some provisions similar to former §12-3-202 were transferred to this section.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 83 provided that the act, which repealed and reenacted this part, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on and after July 1, 2013.

12-3-502. Solicitations — Responses — Rejection of responses — Correction or withdrawal of responses — Cancellation of awards or contracts — Filing of notices of intent to award — Procurement and performance bonds or other security.

The central procurement office shall publicly advertise a copy of the solicitation. All responses received by the central procurement office shall be opened and examined at the time and place specified in the solicitation. Any and all responses may be rejected pursuant to subsection (b).

Whenever the chief procurement officer approves the rejection of all responses for a certain solicitation, the chief procurement officer shall file a notice of such action with the comptroller of the treasury and shall take such action only for one (1) or more of the following reasons:

Unreasonably high prices;

Error in the solicitation;

Cessation of need;

Unavailability of funds; or

Any other reason determined to be in the best interest of the state.

Submission of a response shall not create rights, interests, or claims of entitlement in any respondent, including the lowest apparent respondent in terms of cost.

Correction or withdrawal of inadvertently erroneous responses, before or after award, or cancellation of awards or contracts based on such mistakes, shall be permitted with approval of the chief procurement officer. All cancellation of awards or contracts shall be filed with the comptroller of the treasury.

After response opening, no changes in prices or other provisions of responses prejudicial to the interest of the state or fair competition shall be permitted.

Except as otherwise provided by regulation or policy of the procurement commission, all decisions to permit the correction or withdrawal of responses, or cancel awards or contracts based on response mistakes, shall be supported by a written determination made by the chief procurement officer and such determination shall be filed with the comptroller of the treasury.

Only criteria or factors set forth in the solicitation may be used in evaluating a response.

After response evaluation and prior to award of the contract, the chief procurement officer shall issue a notice of intent to award to all respondents to the solicitation. Notification by the state of intent to award shall not create rights, interests, or claims of entitlement in any respondent.

Upon issuance of the intent to award, all data relating to the procurement shall be made available for inspection to each respondent of the solicitation, upon request. No contract shall be awarded by the chief procurement officer without providing respondents a reasonable opportunity for inspection. The chief procurement officer shall establish procedures for providing inspection by respondents to solicitations. Such procedures shall be approved by the procurement commission. Notification by the state of intent to award shall not create rights, interests, or claims of entitlement in any respondent.

Each contract shall be awarded in the name of the state, with reasonable promptness by written notice to the respondent to whom a contract will be awarded in accordance with the criteria for award as set forth in the solicitation.

Procurement and performance bonds or other security may be required for any contract. Any such requirement shall be set forth in the solicitation. The chief procurement officer shall promulgate rules establishing the requirements for the use and appropriate amount of such bonds or other security with approval by the procurement commission.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 21.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Former title 12, ch. 3, part 5, §§12-3-501 —12-3-531 (Acts 1953, ch. 163, §§ 4-6, 27 (Williams, §§ 370.13-370.15, 370.36); modified; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 5; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 5; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 543, § 7; Acts 1975, ch. 202, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§12-304-12-308,12-3-204 —12-3-208; Acts 1981, ch. 94, §§ 1-4; 1981, ch. 332, §§ 2-6; 1987, ch. 337, § 19; 2005, ch. 166, § 1; 2010, ch. 1098, § 2; 2011, ch. 295, §§ 5, 19), concerning specification, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2013, ch. 403, §§ 20-34, effective July 1, 2013.

Former title 12, chs. 3 and 4 were recodified by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013. In the recodification, some provisions similar to former §12-3-203 were transferred to this section.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 83 provided that the act, which repealed and reenacted this part, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on and after July 1, 2013.

12-3-503. Informal solicitation — Small purchases — Active solicitation of responses from minority-owned, woman-owned, service-disabled veteran-owned, business owned by persons with disabilities, or small business.

The procurement commission may grant the chief procurement officer authority to establish informal solicitation rules, regulations, policies and procedures for procurements. The maximum amount of the procurement shall be determined in accordance with the following:

If all of the members of the procurement commission agree, the amount shall be up to fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) or less; and

Procurement requirements shall not be artificially divided in order to constitute an informal procurement under this section.

The procurement commission may grant the chief procurement officer authority to establish small purchase rules, regulations, policies, and procedures. The maximum amount of the purchases shall be determined in accordance with the following:

If all the members of the procurement commission agree, the amount shall be up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or less; and

Purchasing requirements shall not be artificially divided in order to constitute a small purchase under this section.

Notwithstanding subsections (a) and (b), such state agencies shall actively solicit responses from any minority-owned business, woman-owned business, service-disabled veteran-owned business, business owned by persons with disabilities, or small business in accordance with part 11 of this chapter.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 22; 2017, ch. 485, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Former title 12, ch. 3, part 5, §§12-3-501 —12-3-531 (Acts 1953, ch. 163, §§ 4-6, 27 (Williams, §§ 370.13-370.15, 370.36); modified; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 5; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 5; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 543, § 7; Acts 1975, ch. 202, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§12-304-12-308,12-3-204 —12-3-208; Acts 1981, ch. 94, §§ 1-4; 1981, ch. 332, §§ 2-6; 1987, ch. 337, § 19; 2005, ch. 166, § 1; 2010, ch. 1098, § 2; 2011, ch. 295, §§ 5, 19), concerning specification, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2013, ch. 403, §§ 20-34, effective July 1, 2013.

Former title 12, chs. 3 and 4 were recodified by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013. In the recodification, some provisions similar to former §12-3-204 were transferred to this section.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 83 provided that the act, which repealed and reenacted this part, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on and after July 1, 2013.

12-3-504. Sole source procurement — Noncompetitive negotiation.

The chief procurement officer shall identify goods or services that may not be procured by competitive means because of the existence of a single source of supply. The chief procurement officer shall submit to the procurement commission for approval rules, policies, and procedures prescribing the manner in which such procurements may be accomplished, which may include noncompetitive negotiation. Sole source goods and services shall be purchased only in accordance with these rules, policies, and procedures approved by the procurement commission.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 23.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Former title 12, ch. 3, part 5, §§12-3-501 —12-3-531 (Acts 1953, ch. 163, §§ 4-6, 27 (Williams, §§ 370.13-370.15, 370.36); modified; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 5; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 5; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 543, § 7; Acts 1975, ch. 202, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§12-304-12-308,12-3-204 —12-3-208; Acts 1981, ch. 94, §§ 1-4; 1981, ch. 332, §§ 2-6; 1987, ch. 337, § 19; 2005, ch. 166, § 1; 2010, ch. 1098, § 2; 2011, ch. 295, §§ 5, 19), concerning specification, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2013, ch. 403, §§ 20-34, effective July 1, 2013.

Former title 12, chs. 3 and 4 were recodified by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013. In the recodification, some provisions similar to former §12-3-205 were transferred to this section.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 83 provided that the act, which repealed and reenacted this part, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on and after July 1, 2013.

12-3-505. Emergency purchases.

The chief procurement officer is authorized to purchase for a state governmental entity in the open market specific goods or services for immediate delivery to meet emergencies arising from any unforeseen cause, including, but not limited to, delays by contractors, delays in transportation, unanticipated volume of work, and acts of God. The chief procurement officer may delegate this authority to any state agency; provided, that a report on the circumstances of any such emergency and the actions taken by such state agency as a result of the emergency shall be transmitted in writing as soon as possible by such state agency to the chief procurement officer. The report shall set forth the prices at which goods and services were purchased and the total amount of the purchase. The chief procurement officer shall keep each report on file in the permanent records of the central procurement office. All emergency purchases shall be posted on the single public internet website in such form as prescribed by the procurement commission. All emergency purchases shall, if practicable, be made on the basis of competitive procurement.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 24.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Former title 12, ch. 3, part 5, §§12-3-501 —12-3-531 (Acts 1953, ch. 163, §§ 4-6, 27 (Williams, §§ 370.13-370.15, 370.36); modified; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 5; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 5; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 543, § 7; Acts 1975, ch. 202, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§12-304-12-308,12-3-204 —12-3-208; Acts 1981, ch. 94, §§ 1-4; 1981, ch. 332, §§ 2-6; 1987, ch. 337, § 19; 2005, ch. 166, § 1; 2010, ch. 1098, § 2; 2011, ch. 295, §§ 5, 19), concerning specification, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2013, ch. 403, §§ 20-34, effective July 1, 2013.

Former title 12, chs. 3 and 4 were recodified by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013. In the recodification, some provisions similar to former §12-3-206 were transferred to this section.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 83 provided that the act, which repealed and reenacted this part, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on and after July 1, 2013.

12-3-506. Negotiation with vendors — General services administration price agreement.

In accordance with rules and regulations of the central procurement office approved by the procurement commission and adopted pursuant to title 4, chapter 56, and chapters 3 and 4 of this title, the chief procurement officer is authorized to negotiate with vendors who maintain a general services administration pricing agreement with the United States or any agency thereof; provided, that no contract executed under this section shall authorize a price higher than is contained in the contract between the general services administration and the affected vendor.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 25.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Former title 12, ch. 3, part 5, §§12-3-501 —12-3-531 (Acts 1953, ch. 163, §§ 4-6, 27 (Williams, §§ 370.13-370.15, 370.36); modified; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 5; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 5; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 543, § 7; Acts 1975, ch. 202, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§12-304-12-308,12-3-204 —12-3-208; Acts 1981, ch. 94, §§ 1-4; 1981, ch. 332, §§ 2-6; 1987, ch. 337, § 19; 2005, ch. 166, § 1; 2010, ch. 1098, § 2; 2011, ch. 295, §§ 5, 19), concerning specification, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2013, ch. 403, §§ 20-34, effective July 1, 2013.

Former title 12, chs. 3 and 4 were recodified by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013. In the recodification, some provisions similar to former §12-3-207 were transferred to this section.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 83 provided that the act, which repealed and reenacted this part, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on and after July 1, 2013.

12-3-507. Competitive negotiation.

Except as otherwise provided by law, a contract may be entered into by competitive negotiation when it is determined by the chief procurement officer that it is in the best interest of the state. Each use of competitive negotiation shall be subject to approval by the chief procurement officer and the comptroller of the treasury in accordance with rules, policies, and procedures of the procurement commission. Notice of such approved competitive negotiations shall be posted on the central procurement office's website.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 26.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Former title 12, ch. 3, part 5, §§12-3-501 —12-3-531 (Acts 1953, ch. 163, §§ 4-6, 27 (Williams, §§ 370.13-370.15, 370.36); modified; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 5; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 5; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 543, § 7; Acts 1975, ch. 202, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§12-304-12-308,12-3-204 —12-3-208; Acts 1981, ch. 94, §§ 1-4; 1981, ch. 332, §§ 2-6; 1987, ch. 337, § 19; 2005, ch. 166, § 1; 2010, ch. 1098, § 2; 2011, ch. 295, §§ 5, 19), concerning specification, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2013, ch. 403, §§ 20-34, effective July 1, 2013.

Former title 12, chs. 3 and 4 were recodified by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013. In the recodification, some provisions similar to former §12-3-208 were transferred to this section.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 83 provided that the act, which repealed and reenacted this part, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on and after July 1, 2013.

12-3-508. Utilities — Service contracts.

Subject to rules of the central procurement office approved by the procurement commission, the central procurement office shall purchase or contract for all telephone, telegraph, electric light, gas, power, postal, and other services for which a rate for the use thereof has been established by a public authority, in such manner as the chief procurement officer deems to be in the best interest of the state.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 27.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Former title 12, ch. 3, part 5, §§12-3-501 —12-3-531 (Acts 1953, ch. 163, §§ 4-6, 27 (Williams, §§ 370.13-370.15, 370.36); modified; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 5; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 5; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 543, § 7; Acts 1975, ch. 202, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§12-304-12-308,12-3-204 —12-3-208; Acts 1981, ch. 94, §§ 1-4; 1981, ch. 332, §§ 2-6; 1987, ch. 337, § 19; 2005, ch. 166, § 1; 2010, ch. 1098, § 2; 2011, ch. 295, §§ 5, 19), concerning specification, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2013, ch. 403, §§ 20-34, effective July 1, 2013.

Former title 12, chs. 3 and 4 were recodified by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013. In the recodification, some provisions similar to former §12-3-209 were transferred to this section.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 83 provided that the act, which repealed and reenacted this part, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on and after July 1, 2013.

12-3-509. Certification by receiving agent as condition of payment.

When any goods or services are received by a state agency, the state agency's receiving agent shall certify electronically or in writing that the goods or services received were equal in quality and quantity to those requisitioned or ordered. The certification shall accompany the voucher directing the payment. The state shall not remit funds in payment of any voucher unless the voucher is accompanied by the certification.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 28.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Former title 12, ch. 3, part 5, §§12-3-501 —12-3-531 (Acts 1953, ch. 163, §§ 4-6, 27 (Williams, §§ 370.13-370.15, 370.36); modified; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 5; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 5; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 543, § 7; Acts 1975, ch. 202, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§12-304-12-308,12-3-204 —12-3-208; Acts 1981, ch. 94, §§ 1-4; 1981, ch. 332, §§ 2-6; 1987, ch. 337, § 19; 2005, ch. 166, § 1; 2010, ch. 1098, § 2; 2011, ch. 295, §§ 5, 19), concerning specification, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2013, ch. 403, §§ 20-34, effective July 1, 2013.

Former title 12, chs. 3 and 4 were recodified by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013. In the recodification, some provisions similar to former §12-3-212 were transferred to this section.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 83 provided that the act, which repealed and reenacted this part, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on and after July 1, 2013.

12-3-510. Records of purchases open to public.

Notwithstanding §12-3-502, all procurement records of the department and all records of the procurement commission shall be open and accessible to the public during the regular office hours of the central procurement office or state agency, when such inspections do not interfere with the orderly operation of the central procurement office or state agency.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 29.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Former title 12, ch. 3, part 5, §§12-3-501 —12-3-531 (Acts 1953, ch. 163, §§ 4-6, 27 (Williams, §§ 370.13-370.15, 370.36); modified; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 5; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 5; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 543, § 7; Acts 1975, ch. 202, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§12-304-12-308,12-3-204 —12-3-208; Acts 1981, ch. 94, §§ 1-4; 1981, ch. 332, §§ 2-6; 1987, ch. 337, § 19; 2005, ch. 166, § 1; 2010, ch. 1098, § 2; 2011, ch. 295, §§ 5, 19), concerning specification, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2013, ch. 403, §§ 20-34, effective July 1, 2013.

Former title 12, chs. 3 and 4 were recodified by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013. In the recodification, some provisions similar to former §12-3-213 were transferred to this section.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 83 provided that the act, which repealed and reenacted this part, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on and after July 1, 2013.

12-3-511. Ascertainment of availability of funds.

The central procurement office shall not honor or act upon any requisitions from any state agency without first having ascertained from the commissioner of finance and administration, or other responsible official, the availability of funds to cover the proposed expenditure.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 30.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Former title 12, ch. 3, part 5, §§12-3-501 —12-3-531 (Acts 1953, ch. 163, §§ 4-6, 27 (Williams, §§ 370.13-370.15, 370.36); modified; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 5; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 5; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 543, § 7; Acts 1975, ch. 202, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§12-304-12-308,12-3-204 —12-3-208; Acts 1981, ch. 94, §§ 1-4; 1981, ch. 332, §§ 2-6; 1987, ch. 337, § 19; 2005, ch. 166, § 1; 2010, ch. 1098, § 2; 2011, ch. 295, §§ 5, 19), concerning specification, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2013, ch. 403, §§ 20-34, effective July 1, 2013.

Former title 12, chs. 3 and 4 were recodified by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013. In the recodification, some provisions similar to former §12-3-215 were transferred to this section.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 83 provided that the act, which repealed and reenacted this part, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on and after July 1, 2013.

12-3-512. Cooperative purchasing agreements.

The central procurement office and public institutions of higher education may participate in, sponsor, conduct, or administer a cooperative purchasing agreement for the procurement of goods or services with one (1) or more other states or local governments in accordance with an agreement entered into between the participants. All cooperative purchasing conducted under this section shall be awarded through full and open competition.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 31; 2015, ch. 272, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Former title 12, ch. 3, part 5, §§12-3-501 —12-3-531 (Acts 1953, ch. 163, §§ 4-6, 27 (Williams, §§ 370.13-370.15, 370.36); modified; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 5; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 5; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 543, § 7; Acts 1975, ch. 202, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§12-304-12-308,12-3-204 —12-3-208; Acts 1981, ch. 94, §§ 1-4; 1981, ch. 332, §§ 2-6; 1987, ch. 337, § 19; 2005, ch. 166, § 1; 2010, ch. 1098, § 2; 2011, ch. 295, §§ 5, 19), concerning specification, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2013, ch. 403, §§ 20-34, effective July 1, 2013.

Former title 12, chs. 3 and 4 were recodified by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013. In the recodification, some provisions similar to former §12-3-216 were transferred to this section.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 83 provided that the act, which repealed and reenacted this part, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on and after July 1, 2013.

12-3-513. Competitive reverse auction process.

For a purchase of goods and services under this chapter, the central procurement office may purchase goods and services through a competitive reverse auction process that allows responses on specified goods or services electronically and adjustments to pricing during a specified time period. An award shall be made to the offeror determined to be the lowest responsible and responsive respondent at the close of the specified solicitation period.

Policies and procedures concerning this procurement methodology, including the criteria, and the evaluation process shall be developed by the central procurement office and approved by the procurement commission.

This section shall not apply to:

Construction services; or

Architectural or engineering services.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 32.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Former title 12, ch. 3, part 5, §§12-3-501 —12-3-531 (Acts 1953, ch. 163, §§ 4-6, 27 (Williams, §§ 370.13-370.15, 370.36); modified; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 5; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 5; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 543, § 7; Acts 1975, ch. 202, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§12-304-12-308,12-3-204 —12-3-208; Acts 1981, ch. 94, §§ 1-4; 1981, ch. 332, §§ 2-6; 1987, ch. 337, § 19; 2005, ch. 166, § 1; 2010, ch. 1098, § 2; 2011, ch. 295, §§ 5, 19), concerning specification, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2013, ch. 403, §§ 20-34, effective July 1, 2013.

Former title 12, chs. 3 and 4 were recodified by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013. In the recodification, some provisions similar to former §12-3-219 were transferred to this section.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 83 provided that the act, which repealed and reenacted this part, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on and after July 1, 2013.

12-3-514. Protests by aggrieved respondents.

As used in this section:

“Protest” means a written objection by a respondent, as defined in § 12-3-201, challenging a solicitation, an award, or a proposed award of a contract; and

“Protesting party” means a respondent, as defined in § 12-3-201, who has filed a protest.

Any respondent who has submitted a response to a solicitation authorized under this chapter and who claims to be aggrieved in connection with the solicitation, award, or proposed award of a contract may protest to the chief procurement officer. The protest shall be submitted in writing within seven (7) calendar days after the earlier of the notice of the award or intent to award the contract is issued. Any issues raised by the protesting party after the seven-day period to protest shall not be considered as part of the protest. Upon receipt of a protest of a solicitation, award, or proposed award of a contract, and a protest bond as required in subsection (d), a stay of the solicitation, award, or proposed award shall be in effect until the protest is resolved as provided under this section.

The signature of an attorney or a protesting party on a protest constitutes a certification by the signer that the signer has read the protest and that to the best of the signer's knowledge, information, and belief, formed after reasonable inquiry, the protest is well grounded in fact and is warranted by existing law or a good faith argument for the extension, modification, or reversal of existing law, and that it is not for any improper purpose, such as to harass, limit competition, or cause unnecessary delay or needless increase in the cost of the procurement or of the litigation. If a protest is signed in violation of this subsection (c), then the chief procurement officer or protest committee, upon motion or upon its own initiative, may impose upon the person who signed the protest, a represented party, or both, an appropriate sanction, which may include an order to pay to the other party or parties, including the affected state agency, the amount of the reasonable expenses, including reasonable attorneys' fees incurred from the filing of the protest.

A protest under this section is not actionable unless the protesting party submits a protest bond contemporaneously with a protest. A protest bond shall be payable to the state in the amount of:

Five percent (5%) of the lowest bid or cost proposal evaluated;

Five percent (5%) of the maximum liability or estimated maximum liability provided in the solicitation;

Five percent (5%) of the estimated maximum revenue, if the solicitation, award, or proposed award is for a contract in which the state receives revenue; or

For no-cost contracts, an amount to be determined by the chief procurement officer.

The protest bond shall be in form and substance acceptable to the state and shall be surrendered to the state after the protesting party has had an opportunity to oppose the payment of the protest bond and after a finding by the protest committee that:

The protest was signed, before or after appeal to the chief procurement officer or protest committee, in violation of subsection (c);

The protest has been brought or pursued in bad faith;

The affected state agency has suffered damages resulting in a loss of funding, increased expenditures, or a disruption in services; the protest was filed in bad faith or in violation of subsection (c); and the protest was not upheld;

The protest did not state on its face a valid basis for protest; or

For any other reason approved by the protest committee.

The chief procurement officer shall hold the protest bond for at least eleven (11) calendar days after the date of the final determination of the protest by the chief procurement officer. If a protesting party appeals the chief procurement officer's determination to the protest committee, then the chief procurement officer shall hold the protest bond until instructed by the protest committee to either keep the bond, as set forth in subsection (d), or return it to the protesting party.

At the time of filing a notice of a protest of a solicitation, award, or proposed award of a contract in which the estimated maximum liability, estimated maximum revenue, or lowest evaluated cost proposal is less than one million dollars ($1,000,000), a minority-owned business, woman-owned business, Tennessee service-disabled veteran-owned business, business owned by persons with disabilities, or small business, as those terms are defined in § 12-3-1102, may submit a written petition for exemption from the protest bond requirement of subsection (d). The petition shall include clear evidence of status as a minority-owned business, woman-owned business, Tennessee service-disabled veteran-owned business, business owned by persons with disabilities, or small business. After receipt of the petition by the central procurement office, the chief procurement officer has seven (7) calendar days in which to make a determination. If an exemption from the protest bond requirement is granted, then the protest shall proceed as though the bond were posted. If the chief procurement officer denies an exemption from the protest bond requirement, then the protesting party shall post the protest bond with the chief procurement officer as required in subsection (d) within five (5) calendar days of the determination.

The chief procurement officer, in consultation with the head of the state agency, has authority to resolve the protest. The chief procurement officer shall resolve the protest within sixty (60) calendar days after a protest is filed. The final determination of the chief procurement officer shall be made in writing and submitted to the protesting party, the protest committee, and the comptroller of the treasury. If the chief procurement officer fails to resolve the protest within sixty (60) calendar days, then the protesting party may request that the protest committee meet to consider the protest. The chief procurement officer shall provide the minutes of the protest proceedings to each committee member and to the comptroller of the treasury and shall post the final determination within fifteen (15) business days to the website of the central procurement office. A request for consideration before the protest committee shall be made in writing within seven (7) calendar days from the date of the chief procurement officer's final determination or within seven (7) calendar days following the chief procurement officer's failure to resolve the protest within sixty (60) calendar days after receipt of the protest.

A stay made pursuant to subsection (b) shall not be lifted unless, after giving the protesting party an opportunity to be heard, the chief procurement officer or the protest committee makes a written determination that continuation of the procurement process or the award of the contract without further delay is necessary to protect the interests of the state.

Nothing in this section requires a contested case hearing as set forth in the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5. A protesting party shall exhaust all administrative remedies provided in this section prior to the initiation of any judicial review of a protest.

If a protest is received by the state subsequent to a contract executed pursuant to a procurement process, then the Tennessee claims commission has exclusive jurisdiction to determine all monetary claims against the state, including, but not limited to, claims for the negligent deprivation of statutory rights pursuant to § 9-8-307(a)(1)(N).

Protests appealed to the chancery court from the protest committee shall be by common law writ of certiorari. The scope of review in the proceedings shall be limited to the record made before the protest committee and shall involve only an inquiry into whether the protest committee exceeded its jurisdiction, followed an unlawful procedure, or acted illegally, fraudulently, or arbitrarily without material evidence to support its action.

The procurement commission is authorized to promulgate necessary rules in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, as well as policies and procedures, to implement this section.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 33; 2015, ch. 272, § 2; 2017, ch. 485, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. For the disposition of sections in title 12, ch. 3, as amended by Acts 2013, ch. 403, effective July 1, 2013, please see the table of disposition in §12-3-101.

Former title 12, ch. 3, part 5, §§12-3-501 —12-3-531 (Acts 1953, ch. 163, §§ 4-6, 27 (Williams, §§ 370.13-370.15, 370.36); modified; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 5; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 5; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 543, § 7; Acts 1975, ch. 202, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§12-304-12-308,12-3-204 —12-3-208; Acts 1981, ch. 94, §§ 1-4; 1981, ch. 332, §§ 2-6; 1987, ch. 337, § 19; 2005, ch. 166, § 1; 2010, ch. 1098, § 2; 2011, ch. 295, §§ 5, 19), concerning specification, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2013, ch. 403, §§ 20-34, effective July 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 83 provided that the act, which repealed and reenacted this part, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on and after July 1, 2013.